Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.570

Intent—1995 c 43.

The legislature declares its intent to implement the recommendations of the public health improvement plan by initiating a program to provide the public health system with the necessary capacity to improve the health outcomes of the population of Washington state and establishing the methodology by which improvement in the health outcomes and delivery of public health activities will be assessed.

[ 1995 c 43 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1995 c 43: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1995 c 43 s 14.]

Effective dates—Contingent effective dates—1995 c 43: See note following RCW 70.05.030.